Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-722
Hunting, fishing, trapping, fur harvesting on private lands; unlawful except by permission; replevin of animals or pelts.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to take any wildlife upon any private lands without permission of the owner. It shall be unlawful for anyone to trap or otherwise harvest fur-bearing animals upon the lands of another without his or her consent. Animals and the pelts thereof taken contrary to this section may be replevied by the owner of the lands. For purposes of this section, owner means the actual owner of the land and any tenant or agent in possession or charge thereof for him or her.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 10, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 37-510;

R.S.1943, § 37-510;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 13, p. 588;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-510;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 336.

Persons who hunt on private property without permission are subject to prosecution under this section even if the property is not posted. State v. Blevins, 3 Neb. App. 111, 523 N.W.2d 701 (1994).